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DTC P0711 Transmission Fluid Temperature Sensor ”A”
Performance

CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION
The ATF temperature sensor converts fluid temperature into a resistance value which is input into the Engine
and ECT ECU.

DTC No. DTC Detecting Condition Trouble Area

P0711

Both (a) and (b) are detected: (2−trip detection logic)
(a) After 12 sec. of engine start, temp. of atmosphere and that

of engine coolant is more than −10˚  C
(b) After normal driving for over 20 min. and 10 km, ATF temp.

is less than 10˚  C

S Open or short in ATF temperature sensor No. 1 circuit
SATFtemperaturesensorNo.1
SEngineandECTECU

WIRING DIAGRAM
See page DI−37.

INSPECTION PROCEDURE

1 Checktransmissionwire.

PREPARATION:
Disconnect the transmission wire connector from the transmis-
sion.
CHECK:
Measure resistancebetween terminalsOT+andOT − of the
transmission wire connector and body ground.
OK:

Resistance: 1 M� orhigher
CHECK:
Measure the resistancebetween terminalsOT+andOT −.
OK:

Temperature: �C (�F) Resistance:k �

10 (50) 6.4

110 (230) 0.2

NG Replace the transmission wire (ATF tempera-
ture sensor).

OK
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2 Measure resistance between terminal THO1 and E2 of Engine and ECT ECU con-
nector.

PREPARATION:
(a) Connect the transmission wire connector.
(b) Disconnect the connector of the Engine and ECT ECU.
CHECK:
Measure the resistance between terminals THO1 and E2.
OK:

Temperature: � C (� F) Resistance: k �

10 (50) 6.4

110 (230) 0.2

CHECK:
Measure resistance between terminals THO1 and E2 of the En-
gine and ECT ECU connector and body ground.
OK:

Resistance: 1 M � or higher

NG Repair or replace the harness or connector
(See page IN−38).

OK

Check and replace the Engine and ECT ECU
(See page IN−38).


